Missouri, session 2026, HB3215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 192 and 376, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto three new
sections, to be known as sections 192.1035, 192.1037, and 376.1246, to read as follows:
192.1035. 1. This section and sections 192.1037 and 376.1246 shall be known and
may be cited as the "Missouri Family Building and Fertility Access Act".
2. As used in this section and section 192.1037, the following terms mean:
(1) "Certified fertility clinic", a facility or provider offering fertility treatment
that is accredited by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine or the American
College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists;
(2) "Fertility treatment", procedures, services, and medications used to diagnose
or address infertility, as the term "infertility" is defined by the American Society for
Reproductive Medicine;
(3) "Program", the infertility access program established under subsection 3 of
this section.
3. Subject to appropriation, the department of health and senior services shall
establish a program to be known as the "Infertility Access Program" to improve access
to fertility treatment in this state.
4. The program shall:
(1) Provide travel assistance, lodging stipends, or telehealth subsidies for
individuals in rural or medically underserved areas seeking fertility diagnosis or fertility
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3215 2
treatment at certified fertility clinics and who would otherwise be unable to access
services at a certified fertility clinic;
(2) Support telemedicine infrastructure for fertility specialists serving shortage
areas designated by the department of health and senior services by rule; and
(3) Conduct community outreach and education on infertility care and available
resources.
5. The department of health and senior services may contract with local health
agencies or nonprofit organizations to administer the program.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Infertility Access Fund",
which shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gifts,
contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other sources. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated
fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely to administer the
program established in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
7. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules to
implement this section including, but not limited to, eligibility criteria for assistance
provided through the program. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
192.1037. 1. The department of health and senior services, in coordination with
the department of commerce and insurance, shall produce a report every two years on
access to fertility treatment and outcomes.
2. The report shall include:
(1) Trends in infertility diagnoses, fertility treatment utilization, and outcomes
by region;

HB 3215 3
(2) Barriers to care, including cost, distance, and provider availability;
(3) Recommendations for improving access and equity; and
(4) Comparative data aligned with the state's maternal health dashboards.
3. The department of health and senior services shall submit the report to the
governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president pro tempore of
the senate and make the report publicly available online.
376.1246. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(2) "Fertility treatment", the same meaning given to the term in section
192.1035;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Participating enrollee", an enrollee who receives coverage of fertility
treatment by the enrollee's health carrier.
2. Each health carrier offering coverage of fertility treatment shall publish a
plain-language summary of the fertility coverage on its publicly accessible website
including, but not limited to, information on eligibility, coverage limitations, and
procedures covered.
3. (1) Each health carrier offering coverage of fertility treatment shall, on or
before March first of each calendar year, submit to the department of health and senior
services and the department of commerce and insurance an annual utilization report
including, but not limited to, the following information:
(a) The number of enrollees who received fertility treatment;
(b) The type of fertility treatment provided to participating enrollees;
(c) Geographic distribution of participating enrollees by zip code; and
(d) Demographic data, including age, race, ethnicity, gender, and income range,
of participating enrollees as reported voluntarily or as available through claims data.
(2) All reports submitted under this subsection shall exclude personally
identifiable information and comply with the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.) and state privacy laws.
(3) The department of health and senior services shall aggregate the data from
the reports submitted under this subsection and publish statewide findings annually on
its public website.
4. The department of commerce and insurance may issue such administrative
orders or penalties as authorized under section 374.046 for failure to comply with the
reporting or publication requirements of this section.
5. The department of commerce and insurance may promulgate rules to enforce
compliance with this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in

HB 3215 4
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔